Kentucky statutes. TITLE XLII Miscellaneous Practice Provisions
Original Venue in Civil Actions

452.400.
Certain actions concerning realty to be brought in county where land is situated.

Actions must be brought in the county in which the subject of the action, or some part thereof, is situated:

For the recovery of real property, or of an estate or interest therein;

For the partition of real property except as is provided in KRS

452.420

;

For the sale of real property under a mortgage, lien, or other encumbrance or charge, except for debts of a decedent;

For an injury to real property.

History.

C. C. 62: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953; 1980, ch. 87, § 9, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 277, § 20, effective July 15, 1982.

452.405.
Where action for recovery of fine or forfeiture, against public officer or on official bond must be brought.

Except as otherwise provided by statute, actions shall be brought in the county where the cause of action, or some part thereof, arose:

For the recovery of a fine, penalty, or forfeiture, imposed by a statute; but if the offense for which the claim is made be committed on a watercourse or road which is the boundary of two (2) counties, the action may be brought in either of them;

Against a public officer for an act done by him in virtue or under color of his office, or for a neglect of official duty;

Upon the official bond of a public officer.

History.

C. C. 63: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953; 1996, ch. 1, § 104, effective January 11, 1996; 1996, ch. 2, § 42, effective January 11, 1996.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/96). This section was amended by 1996 Ky. Acts chs. 1 and 2 which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

452.410.
Where action concerning will must be brought.

A proceeding to establish, or an action to set aside, a will must be brought in the county in which the will, if valid, ought, according to law, to be recorded.

History.

C. C. 64: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

452.415.
Where action involving estate of deceased persons or assigned estates must be brought.

Any action to settle the estate of a deceased person, of a person, corporation or company assigned for the benefit of creditors, or any estate in the hands of a receiver of court must be brought in the county in which the personal representative, assignee or receiver qualified. For the purpose of a settlement of such estates, the personal representative, assignee or receiver, shall have the same power to sue as had the deceased person, the assignor, or owner of the estate in such receiver’s hands, but any action brought by a personal representative, assignee or receiver, for the recovery of or sale of under a mortgage, deed of trust or other lien, or for charges upon, or injury to real estate or an estate or interest therein, must be brought in the county in which the real estate is situated, and not elsewhere.

History.

C. C. 65; Acts 1898, ch. 59, § 1; trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953; 1968, ch. 152, § 166.

452.420.
Where action for distribution, partition or sale of decedent’s estate must be brought.

An action for the distribution of the estate of a deceased person, or for its partition among his heirs, or for the sale, for payment of his debts, of property descended from or devised by him, must be brought in the county in which his personal representative was qualified.

History.

C. C. 66: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

452.425.
Where action by ward against guardian must be brought.

An action by a ward against his guardian for a settlement of his accounts, for additional security, or for his removal, must be brought in the county in which the guardian was qualified.

History.

C. C. 67: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

452.430.
Where action against Kentucky Board of Education must be brought.

An action against the Kentucky Board of Education, of this state, must be brought in the county that includes the seat of government.

History.

C. C. 68: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953; 1988, ch. 361, § 17.

452.435.
Where action against prisoner or asylum inmate must be brought.

An action, not mentioned in KRS

452.400

to

452.425

, both inclusive, nor in KRS

452.440

, against a prisoner in this state, or a person confined in an asylum for persons of unsound mind in this state, must be brought in the county, if known, in which he resided, or claimed his residence, when confined.

History.

C. C. 69: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

452.440.
Where action upon return of “no property found” to be brought.

An action upon a return of no property found, pursuant to subsection (1) of KRS

426.381

, must be brought in the county in which the judgment is rendered, or in which the defendant resides or is summoned.

History.

C. C. 70: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

452.445.
Where action against bank or insurance company may be brought.

Excepting the actions mentioned in sections KRS

452.400

to

452.420

both inclusive, and in KRS

452.440

and KRS

452.465

, an action against an incorporated bank or insurance company may be brought in the county in which its principal office or place of business is situated; or, if it arise out of a transaction with an agent of such corporation, it may be brought in the county in which such transaction took place.

History.

C. C. 71: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

452.450.
Where tort or contract action against corporation must be brought.

Excepting the actions mentioned in KRS

452.400

to

452.420

both inclusive, and in KRS

452.430

,

452.440

,

452.445

,

452.455

,

452.465

and

452.475

, an action against a corporation which has an office or place of business in this state, or a chief officer or agent residing in this state, must be brought in the county in which such office or place of business is situated or in which such officer or agent resides; or, if it be upon a contract, in the above-named county, or in the county in which the contract is made or to be performed; or, if it be for a tort, in the first-named county, or the county in which the tort is committed.

History.

C. C. 72: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

452.453.
Where action against tobacco growers and warehousemen must be brought.

Venue in a civil action against a tobacco grower for damages alleged as a result of use or consumption of tobacco products that may have been grown by that tobacco grower shall lie only in the county of residence of the tobacco grower.

Venue in a civil action against a warehouseman for damages alleged as a result of use or consumption of tobacco products that may have been sold by that warehouseman shall lie only in the county in which the tobacco warehouse is located.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 422, § 2, effective April 7, 1998.

452.455.
Where action against common carrier upon contract to carry property or for tort must be brought.

Excepting the actions mentioned in KRS

452.465

, an action against a common carrier, whether a corporation or not, upon a contract to carry property, must be brought in the county in which the defendant, or either of several defendants, resides; or in which the contract is made; or in which the carrier agrees to deliver the property. An action against such carrier for an injury to a passenger, or to other person or his property, must be brought in the county in which the defendant, or either of several defendants, resides; or in which the plaintiff or his property is injured; or in which he resides, if he resides in a county into which the carrier passes; provided, if the action be brought by a personal representative, the residence of the decedent, and not that of the personal representative shall control.

History.

C. C. 73: Acts 1928, ch. 171, § 1; trans. 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

452.460.
Where action for injury to person, property or character must be brought.

Every other action for an injury to the person or property of the plaintiff, and every action for an injury to the character of the plaintiff, against a defendant residing in this state, must be brought in the county in which the defendant resides, or in which the injury is done. Provided, that in actions for libel the action shall be brought in the county in which the plaintiff resides or in the county in which the newspaper or publication is printed or published, or in the county in which the transaction or act or declaration to which the publication relates is stated, or purported to have been done or taken place.

If an injury occurs on a river or stream dividing two (2) or more counties, any county bounding the river at the point the injury occurred may be considered the county in which the injury is done for purposes of bringing the action.

History.

C. C. 74: Acts 1910, ch. 28, § 1; 1922, ch. 122, § 1; trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953; 1958, ch. 61, § 1, effective June 19, 1958.

452.465.
Where action against persons constructively summoned must be brought.

Excepting the actions mentioned in KRS

452.400

to

452.425

, both inclusive, and in KRS

452.440

and KRS

452.470

, an action against a defendant who may be proceeded against by a warning order, must be brought in a county in which the defendant resides at the commencement of the action; or in which he has property; or, in which a person resides against whom he has a valid claim for money or property.

History.

C. C. 75: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

452.470.
Where action for maintenance or dissolution must be brought.

An action for maintenance or dissolution must be brought in the county where the husband or wife usually resides.

History.

C. C. 76: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953; 1982, ch. 58, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

452.475.
Where action against contractor for public work may be brought.

Excepting the actions mentioned in KRS

452.465

, an action against a contractor who undertakes to construct, in whole or in part, any turnpike, bridge, railway, lock, dam, or other public work, for labor done, or materials or supplies furnished, for the construction or promotion of said work, may be brought in the county wherein the labor, or most of it, is done, or wherein the materials, or supplies, or most thereof, are furnished; and if such bridge connect two (2) counties, such action may be brought in either of them.

History.

C. C. 77: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

452.480.
Where transitory action may be brought.

An action which is not required by the foregoing provisions of KRS

452.400

to

452.475

to be brought in some other county may be brought in any county in which the defendant, or in which one (1) of several defendants, who may be properly joined as such in the action, resides or is summoned.

History.

C. C. 78: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

452.485.
When judgment in transitory action not to be rendered against single defendant.

In action brought pursuant to KRS

452.480

, against a single defendant, there shall be no judgment against him, unless he be summoned in the county wherein the action is brought; or, unless he reside in such county when the action is brought and be summoned elsewhere in this state; or, unless he make defense to the action before objecting to the jurisdiction of the court.

History.

C. C. 79: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

452.490.
When judgment in transitory action not to be rendered against several defendants — Bankruptcy.

In an action brought pursuant to KRS

452.480

, against several defendants, no judgment shall be rendered against any of them, upon the service of a summons out of the county in which the action is brought, if no one (1) of them be summoned in that county, nor resided therein when the action was commenced; nor if the action be discontinued or dismissed as to the defendant who resided, or was summoned, in that county; nor if judgment be rendered in his favor, unless a defendant summoned out of that county make defense without objecting to the jurisdiction of the court: provided, that a judgment for a defendant, who resided or was summoned in that county upon a plea of his discharge as a bankrupt, shall not prevent a judgment against any other defendant, in an action brought before the commencement of the proceedings in which the discharge was obtained; but after such judgment, upon a plea of discharge in bankruptcy, a defendant not summoned in the county, nor residing therein at the commencement of the action, may, by answer, deny the liability of such bankrupt. The issue as to the original liability of such bankrupt shall be tried as if he were still a party, and the plaintiff shall not have judgment against the defendant not summoned nor residing in the county, unless it be decided that the bankrupt was originally liable.

History.

C. C. 80: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

452.495.
When defendant in transitory action is immune from summons.

In an action brought pursuant to KRS

452.480

, a defendant who is summoned out of the county in which it is brought, and who did not reside therein when the action was begun, can not be summoned in that or any other action of the plaintiff whilst visiting such county for the sole purpose of defending the first-named action.

History.

C. C. 81: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

452.500.
Removal of defendant after commencement of action.

If, after the commencement of an action in the county of the defendant’s residence, he move therefrom, the service of a summons upon him in any other county shall have the same effect as if it had been made in the county from which he moved.

History.

C. C. 82: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

452.505.
Revenue and fiscal cases.

The following actions may be brought in the Franklin Circuit Court, or in the Franklin District Court, or in any other Circuit Court or District Court having venue:

Actions to collect the revenue and all other claims, demands and penalties due the Commonwealth, or to have satisfaction made of judgments in favor of the Commonwealth, except those actions which are prosecuted by an appeal to the Board of Tax Appeals under the provisions of KRS

49.220

and

131.110

;

Actions against persons required to collect money due the Commonwealth, to pay money into the State Treasury, or to do any other act connected with the payment of money into the State Treasury after it has been collected, and against the sureties, heirs, devisees or representatives of such persons;

Actions to surcharge and correct fee bills, accounts and settlements, with their debits and credits, and all claims against the Treasury allowed and approved by any court in the Commonwealth to any person;

Actions to recover any fraudulent, erroneous or illegal account, fee bill, charge, credit or claim approved and allowed or paid out of the Treasury to any person; and

The defendant in any action brought in Franklin Circuit Court or Franklin District Court under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section for the collection of taxes assessed under KRS Chapter 141 shall at any time prior to the submission for judgment upon proper motion have a change of venue to the county in which he resides or his principal office or place of business is located at no cost to the defendant in Franklin Circuit Court or Franklin District Court.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 484, effective January 8, 1978; 1978, ch. 233, § 34, effective June 17, 1978; 2017 ch. 74, § 102, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 90, effective June 29, 2021.